New York, session 2025-2026, S7611.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. Legislative intent. This Legislature finds that no uniform
regulations exist across New York state outside of New York city which
define wheelchair accessible vehicles. Despite the need for mobility
services for the disabled population, substantive information on wheel-
chair accessible vehicle standards and the number of such vehicles
available does not exist in each county across New York state outside of
New York City.
As such, this Legislature finds that defining a wheelchair accessible
vehicle, conducting a study on the number of wheelchair accessible vehi-
cles, creating benchmarks and granting support for counties across New
York state other than New York City, would allow for local authorities
to make informed policies to increase mobility transportation options
for individuals who are reliant on the use of a wheelchair accessible
vehicle.
§ 2. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section
159-b to read as follows:
§ 159-b. "Wheelchair accessible vehicle". A vehicle, including a taxi-
cab, that has been inspected and approved by the municipal or local
authorizing body as possessing all of the following requirements:
1. Mobility and accessibility
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD11778-02-5

S. 7611--A 2
(a) The lift/ramp width shall be thirty inches minimum.
(b) The design load of the lift/ramp shall be at least six hundred
pounds.
(c) Controls for the lift/ramp shall be interlocked with the vehicle
to ensure that the vehicle cannot be moved while the lift/ramp is in
operation.
(d) Controls for the lift/ramp shall be of the momentary contact type
requiring continuous manual pressure to operate.
(e) The lift/ramp shall be equipped with an emergency deployment meth-
od in the event of power or mechanical failure.
(f) The installation of a lift/ramp shall include provisions to
prevent the lift/ramp from falling or folding any faster than twelve
inches/second in the event of any failure of the load-carrying compo-
nent.
(g) The lift/ramp platform shall be equipped with handrails on two
sides, a minimum of eight inches long and thirty inches above the plat-
form and move in tandem with the lift/ramp.
(h) The lift/ramp platform shall have barriers at least two inches or
higher to prevent mobility aid wheels from slipping off.
(i) Lift/platform surfaces shall be continuous and slip resistant and
accommodate four-wheel and three-wheel mobility aids.
(j) The transition from roadway or sidewalk and the transition from
vehicle floor to the ramp may be vertical without edge treatment up to
one-quarter inch.
(k) Ramps shall have the least slope practical and may not exceed a
one to four ratio when deployed to ground level.
(l) The lift/ramp attachment shall be firmly attached to the vehicle
so that it is not subject to displacement when loading or unloading a
heavy mobility aid and the gap between the vehicle and ramp may not
exceed five-eighths of an inch.
(m) The lift/ramp shall be usable in all weather conditions.
2. Doors, steps and thresholds
(a) For vehicles twenty-two feet in length or less, the overhead
clearance between the top of the door opening. The raised lift platform
or highest point of the ramp shall be a minimum of fifty-nine inches.
(b) Vehicle doorways in which a lift/ramp is installed shall have a
light above or beside each passenger access door to illuminate the load-
ing equipment. Such light shall be constantly lit during the loading or
unloading of passengers. The light shall be shielded to protect the eyes
of entering and exiting passengers.
3. Interior compartment
(a) Floor areas where people walk and securement locations shall have
slip-resistant surfaces.
(b) A minimum clear floor area of thirty inches by forty-eight inches
shall be provided for each wheelchair position.
(c) Regarding seating configuration, vehicles twenty-two feet in
length or less shall provide forward/rear seating only.
(d) Ramp stowage shall be accomplished in a manner as not to pose a
hazard to passengers or impinge on a passenger's mobility aid.
(e) Interior handrails and stanchions shall permit sufficient turning
and maneuvering space for mobility aids including wheelchairs to reach
securement location from lift/ramp.
(f) Handrails and stanchions shall be provided in the entrance to the
vehicle in a configuration which allows people to grasp the assists from
outside the vehicle while starting to board, and to continue using the
assists throughout the boarding process.

S. 7611--A 3
4. Secure systems
(a) A vehicle shall possess a wheelchair securement system that is
able to securely anchor the wheelchair into the vehicle, or able to
encompass both the occupant and the wheelchair to ensure they are
securely anchored into the vehicle.
(b) For each mobility aid securement device, a passenger seat belt and
shoulder harness shall be provided for use by mobility aid users. Such
seat belts shall be in addition to a device which secures the mobility
aid itself.
(c) Securement systems shall be stowed in a way so as not to pose a
hazard to passengers when not in use.
§ 3. The transportation law is amended by adding a new section 14-o to
read as follows:
§ 14-o. Wheelchair accessible vehicles. 1. For the purposes of this
section:
(a) "Taxicab" shall mean any motor vehicle, other than a bus, used in
the business of transporting passengers for compensation, and operated
in such business under a license or permit issued by a local authority.
Such term shall not include vehicles which are rented or leased without
a driver.
(b) "County" shall mean a county in the state of New York, outside of
the city of New York.
(c) "Wheelchair accessible vehicles" shall have the same meaning as
defined in section one hundred fifty-nine-b of the vehicle and traffic
law.
2. The commissioner shall conduct a study relating to the availability
of wheelchair accessible vehicles in every county. Each county shall
provide the department with relevant data which will allow the depart-
ment to complete this study. The scope of such study shall include:
(a) A compilation of data from each county on the number of taxicab
operators within their jurisdiction.
(b) The size of the fleet of each taxicab company or operator.
(c) The number of wheelchair accessible vehicles that comprise the
fleet of each taxicab company or operator.
(d) The catchment areas of each taxicab company or operator.
(e) Any existing county policies or laws which set guidelines on the
number of wheelchair accessible vehicles available in each county or
policies regarding the licensing of wheelchair accessible vehicles by
any taxicab company.
3. All information compiled by the wheelchair accessible vehicle study
under subdivision two of this section shall be assembled and integrated
into a statewide mapping platform in order to identify areas of the
state which may have an accessibility desert and/or insufficient number
of wheelchair accessible vehicles. Such map shall include:
(a) An overlay of the different existing county policies or laws which
set guidelines on the number of wheelchair accessible vehicles.
(b) An overlay of existing programs which provide wheelchair accessi-
ble transportation services in each county.
(c) All other information as outlined under the wheelchair accessible
vehicle study in subdivision two of this section.
(d) All information included in the study shall be made available
digitally and be accessible to the public on the department's website.
4. Upon completion of the wheelchair accessible vehicle study pursuant
to subdivision two of this section, the department, in conjunction with
the office for people with developmental disabilities and the department
of health, shall complete an assessment of each county's data to deter-

S. 7611--A 4
mine if there is an accessibility desert due to an insufficient number
of wheelchair accessible vehicles, and create benchmarks developed
through analysis of U.S. Census Bureau's American Community Survey data
on the prevalence of ambulatory disabilities. This assessment shall
suggest grant programs or tax incentives to increase the number of
wheelchair accessible vehicles.
5. The department shall complete an assessment of all existing wheel-
chair accessible vehicle policies or plans and determine if such plans
are insufficient. Upon determination that a county has an insufficient
plan or is absent of a plan to meet the needs of its constituency, the
department shall require such county to submit a plan that meets the
department's benchmarks in order to increase wheelchair accessible vehi-
cle transportation.
6. Within one hundred eighty days of the publication of the wheelchair
accessible vehicle study map as set forth in subdivision three of this
section, the commissioner shall deliver a copy of the findings of the
study and the benchmarks established pursuant to subdivision four of
this section to all stakeholders and post such findings on the depart-
ment's website. Notification shall be provided to each county subject to
this section. Within one hundred eighty days of the publication of the
wheelchair accessible vehicle study map, each county shall create and
submit a plan to the department pursuant to subdivision five of this
section.
§ 4. The closing paragraph of section 151 of the transportation law,
as amended by section 8 of part G of chapter 58 of the laws of 2012, is
amended and a new subdivision 13 is added to read as follows:
13. As a taxi or livery service, except as specified for wheelchair
accessible vehicles pursuant to section fourteen-o of this chapter,
which is pursuant to the jurisdiction or regulatory control of a munici-
pality, other than a city with a population over one million, authorized
to adopt an ordinance relating to both registration and licensing pursu-
ant to subdivision one of section one hundred eighty-one of the general
municipal law, when such service is available to the general public on a
prearranged or demand-response basis over a non-specified or irregular
route with the point or points of pick-up and discharge determined by
the passenger. For the purpose of this subdivision, wheelchair accessi-
ble vehicles shall be defined pursuant to section one hundred fifty-
nine-b of the vehicle and traffic law.
For the purposes of this article, the term "sedan" or "sedans" as used
[herein] in this section shall include private passenger automobiles,
but shall not include commercial motor vehicles with a seating capacity
of eleven persons or more including the driver, or commercially operated
wheelchair accessible vehicles pursuant to subdivision thirteen of this
section.
§ 5. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall
have become a law.